Nebraska, session 109, LB458.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Permitting Approval Timeliness Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Permitting Approval Timeliness Act is to
ensure timely decisions on permit applications, provide transparency in
the permitting process, and protect the rights of applicants.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Permitting Approval Timeliness Act:
(1) Applicant means any individual, organization, or entity
submitting a permit application for review and approval;
(2) Permit application means an application for a permit that is
required to develop real property or to make improvements to real
property; and
(3) Permitting authority means the state or local governmental
entity responsible for reviewing permit applications and issuing permits
within such governmental entity's jurisdiction.
Sec. 4. (1) A permitting authority shall process permit
applications in a timely manner and shall issue a decision on a complete
permit application within sixty days after its submission.
(2) If a permitting authority fails to issue a decision within sixty
days after submission of a complete permit application, the permit shall
be automatically granted to the applicant.
Sec. 5. (1) If a permitting authority denies a permit application
or approves a permit application with conditions, it shall provide the
applicant with a final decision showing the specific reasons for the
denial or conditional approval.
(2) The reasons for denial or conditional approval shall be based on
applicable laws and regulations clearly established for the issuance of
the relevant permit.
Sec. 6. (1) If a permit application is denied and the denial is
appealed, the court shall review the decision of the permitting authority
de novo. The inquiry in such a case shall extend to the questions of (a)
whether the permitting authority proceeded without jurisdiction or in
-2-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
excess of its jurisdiction, (b) whether there was a fair process, and (c)
whether there was any abuse of discretion.
(2) Abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that
the permitting authority's findings are not supported by clear and
convincing evidence in light of the whole record.
(3) If the court overturns the denial, it may remand the case to the
permitting authority or direct the permitting authority to grant the
permit.
(4) The court retains authority to grant equitable relief where
appropriate and shall award the successful applicant attorney's fees and
expenses. In no case shall attorney's fees or expenses be awarded to the
permitting authority or any third party challenging the granting of a
permit.
Sec. 7. The Permitting Approval Timeliness Act shall apply to the
permit application process to the extent that such process is not
otherwise prescribed by a more specific state statute. If there is any
conflict between a more specific state statute and the provisions of the
act, the more specific state statute shall control.
Sec. 8. Sections 8 to 14 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the By-Right Housing Development Act.
Sec. 9. The purpose of the By-Right Housing Development Act is to
promote the development of housing by streamlining the approval process
for by-right housing development, including single-family homes,
multifamily housing units, and accessory dwelling units. By facilitating
the construction of additional housing units, the act aims to address
statewide housing shortages and promote affordability.
Sec. 10. For purposes of the By-Right Housing Development Act:
(1) Accessory dwelling unit means a secondary housing unit that is
subordinate to the primary dwelling unit on the same lot and may include
a separate kitchen, bathroom, and entrance;
(2) By-right housing development means a housing development that
-3-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
(a) includes single-family homes, multifamily housing units, accessory
dwelling units, or any combination thereof and (b) meets all of the
required criteria outlined in applicable zoning codes and land-use
regulations;
(3) Multifamily housing unit means a residential building containing
two or more housing units, such as apartment buildings, condominiums, or
townhouses; and
(4) Single-family home means a dwelling, either detached or semi-
detached, that is arranged, intended, or designed to be occupied by a
single family.
Sec. 11. All proposed by-right housing developments shall be
approved by right, without the need for discretionary review or approval
by any planning commission, zoning board, or other regulatory authority.
Sec. 12. (1) Regulatory authorities shall monitor approved by-right
housing developments to ensure compliance with applicable regulations and
standards.
(2) Noncompliance with applicable regulations and standards may
result in enforcement actions, such as fines, penalties, or project
modifications to bring the development into compliance.
Sec. 13. Nothing in the By-Right Housing Development Act shall be
construed to invalidate or limit the legality, enforceability, or effect
of restrictive covenants or the regulations of any condominium
association or homeowners' association. Courts shall recognize and
enforce such covenants and regulations in accordance with applicable
laws.
Sec. 14. The By-Right Housing Development Act shall apply to the
housing development approval process to the extent that such process is
not otherwise prescribed by a more specific state statute. If there is
any conflict between a more specific state statute and the provisions of
the act, the more specific state statute shall control.
Sec. 15. (1) For purposes of this section:
-4-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
(a) Duplex housing means a parcel or lot with two dwelling units
that are designed for residential occupancy by not more than two family
units living independently from each other;
(b) Family unit means:
(i) A single person living or residing in a dwelling or place of
residence; or
(ii) Two or more persons living together or residing in the same
dwelling or place of residence;
(c) Manufactured home means (i) a factory-built structure which is
to be used as a place for human habitation, which is not constructed or
equipped with a permanent hitch or other device allowing it to be moved
other than to a permanent site, which does not have permanently attached
to its body or frame any wheels or axles, and which bears a label
certifying that it was built in compliance with National Manufactured
Home Construction and Safety Standards, 24 C.F.R. 3280 et seq.,
promulgated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development, or (ii) a modular housing unit as defined in section 71-1557
bearing a seal in accordance with the Nebraska Uniform Standards for
Modular Housing Units Act; and
(d) Single-family residence means a structure maintained and used as
a single dwelling unit.
(2) The zoning regulations of any municipality shall be:
(a) Adopted in accordance with a comprehensive plan; and
(b) Designed to:
(i) Secure safety from fire and other dangers;
(ii) Promote public health, public safety, and the general welfare;
and
(iii) Facilitate the adequate provision of transportation, water,
sewerage, schools, parks, and other public requirements.
(3) In the adoption of zoning regulations, the governing body of a
municipality shall consider:
-5-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
(a) Reasonable provision of adequate light and air;
(b) The effect on motorized and nonmotorized transportation systems;
(c) Promotion of compatible urban growth;
(d) The character of the zoning district and its peculiar
suitability for particular uses; and
(e) Conserving the value of buildings and encouraging the most
appropriate use of land throughout its zoning jurisdictional area.
(4) In any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary
class, or city of the first class, duplex housing and manufactured homes
shall be allowed as permitted uses on any lots where single-family
residences are permitted, and zoning regulations that apply to the
development or use of duplex housing and manufactured homes shall not be
more restrictive than zoning regulations that are applicable to single-
family residences.
Sec. 16. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Accessory dwelling unit means a self-contained living unit that
(i) includes its own cooking, sleeping, and sanitation facilities, (ii)
complies with or is otherwise exempt from any applicable building code,
fire code, and public health and safety regulations adopted by a
municipality, and (iii) is on the same lot as a single-family dwelling of
greater gross floor area;
(b) By right means the ability to be approved without requiring:
(i) A public hearing;
(ii) A variance, conditional use permit, special permit, or special
exception; or
(iii) Other discretionary zoning action other than a determination
that a site plan conforms with applicable zoning regulations;
(c) Gross floor area means the interior habitable area of a single-
family dwelling or an accessory dwelling unit;
(d) Municipality means an incorporated city or village that
exercises zoning powers; and
-6-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
(e) Single-family dwelling means a building with one or more rooms
designed for residential living purposes by one household that is
detached from any other dwelling unit.
(2)(a) A municipality shall adopt zoning regulations under this
section that allow a minimum of one accessory dwelling unit by right on a
lot or parcel that contains a single-family dwelling.
(b) An accessory dwelling unit may be attached, detached, or
internal to the single-family dwelling on a lot or parcel.
(c) If the accessory dwelling unit is detached from or attached to
the single-family dwelling, the unit may not be more than seventy-five
percent of the gross floor area of the single-family dwelling or one
thousand square feet, whichever is less.
(3) A municipality shall not:
(a) Require that a lot or parcel have additional parking to
accommodate an accessory dwelling unit or require fees in lieu of
additional parking;
(b) Require that an accessory dwelling unit match the exterior
design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the single-family dwelling;
(c) Require that the single-family dwelling or the accessory
dwelling unit be occupied by the owner;
(d) Require a familial, marital, or employment relationship between
the occupants of the single-family dwelling and the occupants of the
accessory dwelling unit;
(e) Assess impact fees on the construction of an accessory dwelling
unit;
(f) Require improvements to public streets as a condition of
permitting an accessory dwelling unit except as necessary to reconstruct
or repair a public street that is disturbed as a result of the
construction of the accessory dwelling unit;
(g) Set maximum building heights, minimum setback requirements,
minimum lot sizes, maximum lot coverages, or minimum building frontages
-7-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
for accessory dwelling units that are more restrictive than those for the
single-family dwelling on the lot;
(h) Impose more onerous development standards on an accessory
dwelling unit beyond those set forth in this section; or
(i) Require a restrictive covenant concerning an accessory dwelling
unit on a parcel zoned for residential use by a single-family dwelling.
This subdivision (i) shall not be construed to prohibit restrictive
covenants concerning accessory dwelling units entered into between
private parties, but the municipality shall not condition a permit,
license, or use of an accessory dwelling unit on the adoption or
implementation of a restrictive covenant entered into between private
parties.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a municipality from regulating
short-term rentals as defined in section 18-1758.
(5) A municipality may require a fee for reviewing applications to
create accessory dwelling units. The one-time application fee shall not
exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each accessory dwelling unit.
Nothing in this section prohibits a municipality from requiring its usual
building fees in addition to the application fee.
(6) A municipality that has not adopted or amended zoning
regulations pursuant to this section by January 1, 2026, shall review and
permit accessory dwelling units in accordance with the requirements of
this section until regulations are adopted or amended. Regulations in
effect on or after January 1, 2026, that apply to accessory dwelling
units and do not comply with this section are void.
(7) This section does not supersede any applicable building code,
fire code, or public health and safety regulation adopted by a
municipality except as restricted by this section.
(8) A municipality may require an accessory dwelling unit to have a
letter from both a municipal water system and a municipal sewer system
affirming provision of water and sewer service.
-8-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
(9) Nothing in this section prohibits a municipality from adopting
regulations that are more permissive than the provisions regarding
accessory dwelling units provided in this section.
Sec. 17. Section 18-3417, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-3417 (1)(a) At any sale of real property for the nonpayment of
taxes conducted pursuant to sections 77-1801 to 77-1863, a land bank may:
(i) Bid on such real property in an amount equal to the total amount
of taxes, interest, and costs due on the real property. If a bid is given
pursuant to this subdivision, the bid shall not receive any special
treatment by the county treasurer and shall be accepted or rejected in
the same manner as any other bid on such real property; or
(ii) If a land bank is created by a city of the metropolitan class
that borders a county in which at least three cities of the first class
are located and if approved by a two-thirds vote of the board, give an
automatically accepted bid on such real property in an amount equal to
the total amount of taxes, interest, and costs due on the real property.
If an automatically accepted bid is given, it shall be accepted by the
county treasurer regardless of any other bids on such real property. An
automatically accepted bid may be given only if the conditions for making
such a bid prescribed by the board pursuant to subsection (11) of section
18-3405 have been met.
(b) If a land bank's bid pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this
section is accepted by the county treasurer, the land bank shall pay the
county treasurer and shall be entitled to a tax sale certificate for such
real property.
(2) If a county holds a tax sale certificate pursuant to section
77-1809, a land bank may purchase such tax sale certificate from the
county by paying the county treasurer the amount expressed on the face of
the certificate and interest thereon at the rate specified in section
45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the
-9-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
Legislature, from the date the tax sale certificate was first issued to
the county to the date such certificate was purchased by the land bank.
(3)(a) Subdivision (b) of this subsection applies until January 1,
2015. Subdivision (c) of this subsection applies beginning January 1,
2015.
(b) Within six months after the expiration of three years from the
date of sale of real property for the nonpayment of taxes pursuant to
sections 77-1801 to 77-1863, a land bank that has acquired a tax sale
certificate for such real property under this section may:
(i) Apply to the county treasurer for a tax deed for the real
property described in the tax sale certificate. A land bank applying for
a tax deed shall comply with all the requirements of sections 77-1801 to
77-1863 relating to such tax deed; or
(ii) Foreclose the lien represented by the tax sale certificate as
authorized in section 77-1902.
(3) A (c) Within nine months after the expiration of three years
from the date of sale of real property for the nonpayment of taxes
pursuant to sections 77-1801 to 77-1863, a land bank that has acquired a
tax sale certificate for such real property under this section may:
(a) (i) Apply to the county treasurer for a tax deed for the real
property described in the tax sale certificate. The land bank shall apply
for such tax deed within the time period prescribed in subdivision (1)(a)
or (b) of section 77-1837, whichever is applicable, and A land bank
applying for a tax deed shall comply with all the requirements of
sections 77-1801 to 77-1863 relating to such tax deed; or
(b) (ii) Foreclose the lien represented by the tax sale certificate
as authorized in section 77-1902. The land bank shall foreclose such lien
within the time period prescribed in subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of section
77-1902, whichever is applicable.
Sec. 18. Section 77-1802, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-10-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
77-1802 The county treasurer shall, not less than four nor more than
six weeks prior to the first Monday of March in each year, make out a
list of all real property subject to sale and the amount of all
delinquent taxes against each item with an accompanying notice stating
that so much of such property described in the list as may be necessary
for that purpose will, on the first Monday of March next thereafter, be
sold by such county treasurer at public auction at his or her office or
other designated location for the taxes, interest, and costs thereon. In
making such list, the county treasurer shall describe the property as it
is described on the tax list and shall include the name of the owner of
record of the property as shown on the most current certified tax roll,
the property's parcel number, if any, and the property's street address,
if any.
Sec. 19. Section 77-1804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1804 (1) The county treasurer shall cause the list of real
property subject to sale and accompanying notice to be published once a
week for three consecutive weeks prior to the date of sale, commencing
the first week in February, in a legal newspaper and, in counties having
more than two hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, in a daily legal
newspaper of general circulation, published in the English language in
the county, and designated by the county board. The county treasurer
shall also cause to be posted in some conspicuous place in his or her
office a copy of such notice. The treasurer shall assess against each
description the sum of twenty five dollars to defray the expenses of
advertising, which sum shall be added to the total amount due on such
real property and be collected in the same manner as taxes are collected.
(2) The county treasurer shall also forward an electronic copy of
the list of real property subject to sale to the Property Tax
Administrator who shall compile a list for all counties and publish the
compiled list on the website of the Department of Revenue.
-11-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to examine the twenty-dollar
fee provided in subsection (1) of this section at least once every five
years beginning in 2030 in order to determine whether such fee should be
adjusted.
Sec. 20. Section 77-1806, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1806 On the day designated in the notice of sale, the county
treasurer or his or her designee shall commence the sale of the real
property on which the taxes and charges have not been paid and shall
continue the sale from day to day, Sundays and holidays excepted, until
each item of real property or so much thereof as is sufficient to pay the
taxes and charges thereon, including the cost of advertising, has been
sold or offered for sale.
Sec. 21. Section 77-1807, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1807 (1)(a) This subsection applies until January 1, 2015.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of this
subsection, the person who offers to pay the amount of taxes due on any
real property for the smallest portion of the same shall be the
purchaser, and when such person designates the smallest portion of the
real property for which he or she will pay the amount of taxes assessed
against any such property, the portion thus designated shall be
considered an undivided portion.
(c) If a land bank gives an automatically accepted bid for the real
property pursuant to section 18-3417, the land bank shall be the
purchaser, regardless of the bid of any other person.
(d) If no person bids for a less quantity than the whole and no land
bank has given an automatically accepted bid pursuant to section 18-3417,
the treasurer may sell any real property to any one who will take the
whole and pay the taxes and charges thereon.
(e) If the homestead is listed separately as a homestead, it shall
-12-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
be sold only for the taxes delinquent thereon.
(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning January 1, 2015.
(b) If a land bank gives an automatically accepted bid for real
property pursuant to section 18-3417, the land bank shall be the
purchaser and no public or private auction shall be held under sections
77-1801 to 77-1863.
(c) If no land bank has given an automatically accepted bid pursuant
to section 18-3417, the person who offers to pay the amount of taxes,
delinquent interest, and costs due on any real property shall be the
purchaser.
(d) The county treasurer or his or her designee shall announce
bidding rules at the beginning of the public auction, and such rules
shall apply to all bidders throughout the public auction.
(e) The sale, if conducted in a round-robin format, shall be
conducted in the following manner:
(i) At the commencement of the sale, a count shall be taken of the
number of registered bidders present who want to be eligible to purchase
property. Each registered bidder shall only be counted once. If
additional registered bidders appear at the sale after the commencement
of a round, such registered bidders shall have the opportunity to
participate at the end of the next following round, if any, as provided
in subdivision (v) of this subdivision;
(ii) Sequentially enumerated tickets shall be placed in a
receptacle. The number of tickets in the receptacle for the first round
shall equal the count taken in subdivision (i) of this subdivision, and
the number of tickets in the receptacle for each subsequent round shall
equal the number of the count taken in subdivision (i) of this
subdivision plus additional registered bidders as provided in subdivision
(v) of this subdivision;
(iii) In a manner determined by the county treasurer or his or her
designee, tickets shall be selected from the receptacle by hand for each
-13-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
registered bidder whereby each ticket has an equal chance of being
selected. Tickets shall be selected until there are no tickets remaining
in the receptacle;
(iv) The number on the ticket selected for a registered bidder shall
represent the order in which a registered bidder may purchase property
consisting of one parcel subject to sale from the list per round; and
(v) If property listed remains unsold at the end of a round, a new
round shall commence until all property listed is either sold or, if any
property listed remains unsold, each registered bidder has consecutively
passed on the opportunity to make a purchase. Registered bidders who are
not present when it is their turn to purchase property shall be
considered to have passed on the opportunity to make a purchase. At the
beginning of the second and any subsequent rounds, the county treasurer
or his or her designee shall inquire whether there are additional
registered bidders. If additional registered bidders are present, tickets
for each such bidder shall be placed in a receptacle and selected as
provided in subdivisions (ii) through (iv) of this subdivision. The
second and any subsequent rounds shall proceed in the same manner and
purchase order as the last preceding round, except that any additional
registered bidders shall be given the opportunity to purchase at the end
of the round in the order designated on their ticket.
(f) Any property remaining unsold upon completion of the public
auction shall be sold at a private sale pursuant to section 77-1814.
(g) A bidder shall (i) register with the county treasurer or his or
her designee prior to participating in the sale, (ii) provide proof that
it maintains a registered agent for service of process with the Secretary
of State if the bidder is a foreign corporation, and (iii) pay a twenty-
five-dollar registration fee. The fee is not refundable upon redemption.
Sec. 22. Section 77-1815, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1815 If any treasurer fails to attend any sale of real property
-14-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
as required by sections 77-1801 to 77-1814, either in person or by
designee deputy, he or she shall be liable to a fine of not less than
fifty nor more than three hundred dollars to be recovered by an action in
the district court in the name of the county against the treasurer and
the person issuing the treasurer's bond.
Sec. 23. Section 77-1816, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1816 If any treasurer or designee deputy shall sell or assist in
selling any real property, knowing the same to be not subject to
taxation, or that the taxes for which the same is sold have been paid, or
shall knowingly and willfully sell, or assist in selling, any real
property for the payment of taxes to defraud the owner of such real
property, or shall knowingly execute a deed for property so sold, he
shall be deemed guilty of a Class I misdemeanor and shall be liable to
pay the injured party all damages sustained by such wrongful act, and all
such sales shall be void.
Sec. 24. Section 77-1818, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1818 (1) The purchaser of any real property sold by the county
treasurer or his or her designee for taxes shall be entitled to a
certificate in writing, describing the real property so purchased, the
sum paid, the date when the purchaser will be entitled to a deed for real
property determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section
77-1837, and the date time when the purchaser will be entitled to a deed
for any other real property, which certificate shall be signed by the
county treasurer in his or her official capacity and shall be presumptive
evidence of the regularity of all prior proceedings. The certificate may
be provided to the purchaser by hand delivery, mail, or electronic means.
Each tax lien shall be shown on a single certificate. The purchaser
acquires a perpetual lien of the tax on the real property, and if after
the taxes become delinquent he or she subsequently pays any taxes levied
-15-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
on the property, whether levied for any year or years previous or
subsequent to such sale, he or she shall have the same lien for them and
may add them to the amount paid by him or her in the purchase.
(2) Upon issuance of the certificate, the purchaser shall notify, by
personal or residence service, and if unsuccessful, by certified mail
service, the property owner of the real property that was sold for taxes
at the address listed for such owner in the records of the county
assessor. The notice shall (a) state that a certificate has been issued,
(b) include a brief description of the property owner's legal rights to
redeem the real property, (c) identify the real property by the street
address listed in the records of the county assessor, (d) include the
total amount of taxes, interest, and costs for which the property was
sold and a recitation that interest and fees may accrue, and (e) include
the purchaser's name, and (f) include a prominent warning that failure to
act may result in forfeiture of the property. Upon the issuance of the
certificate, an administrative fee of one hundred fifty dollars shall be
charged to the property owner. The after three years. The purchaser shall
prove such service of notice by affidavit, and such affidavit shall be
filed with the application for the tax deed pursuant to section 77-1837.
An administrative fee shall be allowed for any service of notice under
this subsection. The administrative fee shall be equal to the greater of
one hundred dollars or the actual cost incurred by the purchaser for such
service of notice. The amount of such fee shall be noted by the county
treasurer in the record opposite the real property described in the
notice and shall be collected by the county treasurer in case of
redemption for the benefit of the holder of the certificate. The
purchaser shall notify the county treasurer of the amount of such fee
within thirty days after completion of the service of notice.
(3) Personal or residence service under subsection (2) of this
section is not required on certificates purchased by or issued to
counties pursuant to sections 77-1809 and 77-1918.
-16-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
Sec. 25. Section 77-1819, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1819 The certificate shall be substantially in the following
form: COUNTY TREASURER'S CERTIFICATE OF TAX SALE. State of
Nebraska .............. County, ss: I, .............. treasurer of the
county of .............., in the State of Nebraska, do hereby certify
that the following described real estate in such county and state:
(describe the same) was, on the .......... day of .......... 20...., duly
sold by me in the manner provided by law for the delinquent taxes for the
years .....(list years)..... thereon, amounting to .......... dollars,
including interest thereon, and costs allowed by law, to ........... for
the sum of .......... dollars. I further certify that unless redemption
is made of such real estate in the manner provided by law,
the .........., heirs or assigns will be entitled to a deed therefor on
and after the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., on surrender of
this certificate, and compliance with the provisions required by law, on
and after the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., for real property
determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to section 77-1837, or on
and after the .......... day of .......... A.D. 20...., for any other
real property.
In witness whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this .......... day
of .......... A.D. 20.... .
(L.S.) ....................., Treasurer.
Sec. 26. Section 77-1823, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1823 The county treasurer shall charge a twenty-five-dollar
twenty-dollar issuance fee for each deed or certificate made by him or
her for a sale of real property for taxes together with the fee of the
notary public or other officer acknowledging the deed. The issuance fee
shall not be required if the tax sale certificate is issued in the name
of the county, but the issuance fee is due from the purchaser when the
-17-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
county assigns the certificate to another person. The fee is not
refundable upon redemption. Whenever the county treasurer makes a deed to
any real property sold for taxes, he or she shall enter an account
thereof in the record opposite the description of the real property
conveyed.
Sec. 27. Section 77-1825, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1825 The county treasurer shall enter a memorandum of redemption
of real property in the record and shall give a receipt therefor to the
person redeeming the same , for which the county treasurer may charge a
fee of two dollars. The county treasurer shall send written notice of
redemption to the holder of the county treasurer's certificate of tax
sale by first-class mail if the post office address of the holder of the
certificate is filed in the office of the county treasurer or by
electronic means if previously agreed to by the parties. The redemption
money shall be paid to or upon the order of the holder on return of the
certificate.
Sec. 28. Section 77-1829, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1829 If any purchaser of real property sold for taxes under
sections 77-1801 to 77-1860 suffers the same to be again sold for taxes
before the expiration of the last day of the second annual sale
thereafter, such purchaser shall not be entitled to a deed for such real
property until the expiration of a like term from the date of the second
sale, during which time the real property shall be subject to redemption
upon the terms and conditions prescribed by law. This section shall not
apply to real property determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to
section 77-1837.
Sec. 29. Section 77-1831, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1831 No purchaser at any sale for taxes or his or her assignees
-18-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
shall be entitled to a tax deed from the county treasurer for the real
property so purchased unless such purchaser or assignee, at least three
months before applying for the tax deed, serves or causes to be served a
notice that states, after the expiration of at least three months from
the date of service of such notice, the tax deed will be applied for.
The notice shall include:
(1) The following statement in sixteen-point type: UNLESS YOU ACT
YOU WILL LOSE THIS PROPERTY;
(2) The date when the purchaser purchased the real property sold by
the county for taxes;
(3) The description of the real property;
(4) In whose name the real property was assessed;
(5) The amount of taxes represented by the tax sale certificate, the
year the taxes were levied or assessed, and a statement that subsequent
taxes may have been paid and interest and fees may have accrued as of the
date the notice is signed by the purchaser; and
(6) The following statements:
(a) That the issuance of a tax deed is subject to the right of
redemption under sections 77-1824 to 77-1830;
(b) The right of redemption requires payment to the county
treasurer, for the use of such purchaser, or his or her heirs or assigns,
the amount of taxes represented by the tax sale certificate for the year
the taxes were levied or assessed and any subsequent taxes paid and
interest accrued as of the date payment is made to the county treasurer;
and
(c) The right of redemption expires at the close of business on the
date of application for the tax deed, and a deed may be applied for after
the expiration of three months from the date of service of this notice.
Sec. 30. Section 77-1832, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1832 (1) Service of the notice provided by section 77-1831 shall
-19-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
be made by:
(a) Personal or residence service as described in section 25-505.01
upon a person in actual possession or occupancy of the real property and
upon the person in whose name the title to the real property appears of
record who can be found in this state. If a person in actual possession
or occupancy of the real property cannot be served by personal or
residence service, service of the notice shall be made upon such person
by certified mail service or designated delivery service as described in
section 25-505.01, and the notice shall be sent to the address of the
property. If the person in whose name the title to the real property
appears of record cannot be found in this state or if such person cannot
be served by personal or residence service, service of the notice shall
be made upon such person by certified mail service or designated delivery
service as described in section 25-505.01, and the notice shall be sent
to the name and address to which the property tax statement was mailed.
If the real property has been determined to be vacant and abandoned
pursuant to section 77-1837, then certified mail service or designated
delivery service shall not be used to serve any person with notice under
this subdivision until three unsuccessful attempts at personal or
residence service have been made; and
(b) Certified mail or designated delivery service as described in
section 25-505.01 upon every encumbrancer of record found by the title
search required in section 77-1833. The notice shall be sent to the
encumbrancer's name and address appearing of record as shown in the
encumbrance filed with the register of deeds.
(2) Personal or residence service shall be made by the county
sheriff of the county where service is made or by a person authorized by
section 25-507. The sheriff or other person serving the notice shall be
entitled to the statutory fee prescribed in section 33-117.
Sec. 31. Section 77-1833, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-20-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
77-1833 The service of notice provided by section 77-1832 shall be
proved by affidavit. The purchaser or assignee shall also affirm in the
affidavit that a title search was conducted by a registered abstracter to
determine those persons entitled to notice pursuant to such section. If
personal or residence service is used, the receipt or returns provided by
the person authorized in subsection (2) of section 77-1832 to carry out
such service shall be filed with and accompany the affidavit. If
certified mail or designated delivery service is used, the certified mail
return receipt or a copy of the signed delivery receipt shall be filed
with and accompany the affidavit. The affidavit, a copy of the notice,
and a copy of such title search shall be filed with the application for
the tax deed pursuant to section 77-1837. For each service of such
notice, a fee of one dollar shall be allowed. The amount of such fees
shall be noted by the county treasurer in the record opposite the real
property described in the notice and shall be collected by the county
treasurer in case of redemption for the benefit of the holder of the
certificate.
Sec. 32. Section 77-1836, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1836 If any person is compelled to publish notice in a newspaper
as provided in sections 77-1834 and 77-1835, then before any person who
may have a right to redeem such real property from such sale is permitted
to redeem, he or she shall pay the officer or person who by law is
authorized to receive such redemption money the amount paid for
publishing such notice, for the use of the person compelled to publish
the notice. The fee for such publication shall not exceed twenty five
dollars for each item of real property contained in such notice. The cost
of making such publication shall be noted by the county treasurer in the
record opposite the real property described in the notice.
Sec. 33. Section 77-1837, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-21-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
77-1837 (1) The At any time within nine months after the expiration
of three years after the date of sale of any real estate for taxes or
special assessments, if such real estate has not been redeemed and the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section have been met, the
purchaser of real estate sold for taxes or his or her assignee may apply
to the county treasurer for a tax deed for the real estate described in
such purchaser's or assignee's tax sale certificate if such real estate
has not been redeemed and if the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section have been met. Such purchaser or assignee shall apply within
whichever of the following two timeframes is applicable:
(a) For real estate determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section, the purchaser or assignee shall apply
at any time within nine months after the expiration of two years after
the date of sale of the real estate for taxes or special assessments; or
(b) For any other real estate, the purchaser or assignee shall apply
at any time within nine months after the expiration of three years after
the date of sale of the real estate for taxes or special assessments.
(2) The county treasurer shall execute and deliver a deed of
conveyance for the real estate described in the such tax sale certificate
if he or she has received the following:
(a) The tax sale certificate;
(b) The issuance fee for the tax deed and the fee of the notary
public or other officer acknowledging the tax deed, as required under
section 77-1823;
(c) The affidavit proving personal service of the notice required in
subsection (2) of section 77-1818;
(c) (d) For any notice provided pursuant to section 77-1832, the
affidavit proving service of notice, the copy of the notice, and the copy
of the title search required under section 77-1833; and
(d) (e) For any notice provided by publication pursuant to section
77-1834, the affidavit of the publisher, manager, or other employee of
-22-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
the newspaper, the copy of the notice, the affidavit of the purchaser or
assignee, and the copy of the title search required under section
77-1835; .
(e) An affidavit of the purchaser or his or her assignee that the
value of the property complies with subsection (3) of this section; and
(f) For any real estate determined to be vacant and abandoned
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the affidavit of the
purchaser or assignee affirming that the real estate is vacant and
abandoned.
(3) (2) The purchaser or his or her assignee may apply for a tax
deed under this section if one hundred ten percent of the assessed value
of the real estate described in the tax sale certificate as reflected in
the records of the county assessor at the time of the application for the
tax deed, less the amount that would be needed to redeem such real
estate, is twenty-five thousand dollars or less. If such requirement is
not met, the purchaser or his or her assignee shall foreclose the lien
represented by the tax sale certificate pursuant to section 77-1902.
(4) (3) The failure of the county treasurer to issue the deed of
conveyance if requested within the applicable timeframe provided in
subsection (1) of this section shall not impair the validity of such deed
if there has otherwise been compliance with sections 77-1801 to 77-1863.
(5)(a) For purposes of this section, real estate may be considered
vacant and abandoned if:
(i) The purchaser or assignee in question is a land bank as defined
in section 18-3403; and
(ii) Such property substantially meets more than two of the
following criteria:
(A) The property is not occupied by the owner or any lessee or
licensee of the owner;
(B) Utility service to the property, including, but not limited to,
gas, electric, or water service, has been disconnected or delinquent for
-23-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
over one year;
(C) A building on the property has been deemed unfit for human
habitation, occupancy, or use by local housing officials;
(D) A building on the property is open and unprotected and in
reasonable danger of significant damage resulting from exposure to the
elements or vandalism;
(E) A building on the property is unsecure due to multiple windows
and doors being boarded up or closed off, smashed through, broken off or
unhinged, or continuously unlocked;
(F) The property has been stripped of copper or other materials or
interior fixtures to the property have been removed;
(G) There have not been any recent efforts made to restore the
property to productive use;
(H) There is a presence of vermin, uncut vegetation, or debris
accumulation on the property;
(I) There have been past actions by the applicable municipality or
county to maintain the grounds or a building on the property;
(J) The property has been out of compliance with orders of local
housing officials; or
(K) Any other condition or circumstance reasonably indicating that
the property is vacant and abandoned.
(b) The purchaser or assignee shall determine whether or not real
estate is vacant and abandoned two years after the date of the sale of
such real estate for taxes or special assessments.
(c) If the real estate is registered as vacant and abandoned
pursuant to a vacant property registration ordinance adopted by a
municipality, it shall be conclusive proof that such real estate is
vacant and abandoned. If the real estate is not registered as vacant and
abandoned pursuant to such an ordinance, the purchaser or assignee shall
not be obligated to proceed under subdivision (1)(a) of this section, but
may instead choose to proceed under subdivision (1)(b) of this section,
-24-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
and no tax deed subsequently issued to such purchaser or assignee shall
be deemed invalid due to noncompliance with subdivision (1)(a) of this
section. No action taken by a purchaser or assignee under subdivision (1)
(a) of this section shall prohibit a subsequent action under subdivision
(1)(b) of this section on the same real estate should it be determined
that such real estate is not vacant and abandoned.
(d) If the purchaser or assignee determines real estate to be vacant
and abandoned pursuant to this subsection, the purchaser or assignee
shall submit an affidavit to the county treasurer affirming that the real
estate is vacant and abandoned.
Sec. 34. Section 77-1838, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1838 (1) The deed made by the county treasurer shall be under the
official seal of office and acknowledged by the county treasurer before
some officer authorized to take the acknowledgment of deeds. When so
executed and acknowledged, it shall be recorded in the same manner as
other conveyances of real estate. When recorded it shall vest in the
grantee and his or her heirs and assigns the title of the property
described in the deed, subject to any lien on real estate for special
assessments levied by a sanitary and improvement district which special
assessments have not been previously offered for sale by the county
treasurer.
(2) Within thirty days after recording of the deed, the grantee
shall pay the surplus to the previous owner of the property described in
the deed. For purposes of this subsection, the surplus shall be
calculated as follows:
(a) If the property has been sold since recording of the deed, the
surplus shall be equal to the amount received from such sale, minus (i)
the amount that would have been needed to redeem such property, (ii) the
amount needed to pay all encumbrances on such property, and (iii) an
administrative fee of five hundred dollars or reasonable attorney's fees
-25-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
in the event of judicial foreclosure, which may be retained by the
grantee to offset the costs incurred in obtaining the deed; or
(b) If the property has not been sold since recording of the deed,
the surplus shall be equal to the assessed value of such property as
reflected in the records of the county assessor at the time of the
application for the tax deed, minus (i) the amount that would have been
needed to redeem such property, (ii) the amount needed to pay all
encumbrances on such property, and (iii) an administrative fee of five
hundred dollars or reasonable attorney's fees in the event of judicial
foreclosure, which may be retained by the grantee to offset the costs
incurred in obtaining the deed.
Sec. 35. Section 77-1856, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1856 If the owner of any tax sale certificate fails or neglects
to demand a deed thereon or to commence an action for the foreclosure of
the same within the time specified in subdivision (1)(b) of section
77-1837 or subdivision (2)(b) of section 77-1902, such tax sale
certificate shall cease to be valid or of any force or effect whatever
and the real property covered thereby shall be forever released and
discharged from the lien of all taxes for which the real property was
sold. It is made the duty of each and every county treasurer of the State
of Nebraska to enter on the tax sale records of his or her office a
cancellation of all tax sales on which the time specified in subdivision
(1)(b) of section 77-1837 or subdivision (2)(b) of section 77-1902 has
elapsed since date of sale, with date of entry affixed, in language
substantially as follows: Canceled by section 77-1856. No county
treasurer or bonded abstracter shall be held responsible on his or her
bond or otherwise on account of such entry being made in accordance with
this section. All real property covered by tax sales that comes within
the provisions of sections 77-1801 to 77-1860 shall from the time of this
entry be considered to stand of record as though no tax sale had ever
-26-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
been made.
Sec. 36. Section 77-1902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1902 (1) When land has been sold for delinquent taxes and a tax
sale certificate or tax deed has been issued, the holder of such tax sale
certificate or tax deed may, instead of demanding a deed or, if a deed
has been issued, by surrendering the same in court, proceed in the
district court of the county in which the land is situated to foreclose
the lien for taxes represented by the tax sale certificate or tax deed
and all subsequent tax liens thereon, excluding any lien on real estate
for special assessments levied by any sanitary and improvement district
which special assessments have not been previously offered for sale by
the county treasurer, in the same manner and with like effect as in the
foreclosure of a real estate mortgage, except as otherwise specifically
provided by sections 77-1903 to 77-1917.
(2) Such action shall be brought within whichever of the following
two timeframes is applicable:
(a) For real estate determined to be vacant and abandoned pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section, the action shall be brought within
nine months after the expiration of two years from the date of sale of
the real estate for taxes or special assessments; or
(b) For any other real estate, the action shall only be brought
within nine months after the expiration of three years from the date of
sale of the any real estate for taxes or special assessments.
(3)(a) For purposes of this section, real estate may be considered
vacant and abandoned if:
(i) The holder of the tax sale certificate or tax deed is a land
bank as defined in section 18-3403; and
(ii) Such property substantially meets more than two of the
following criteria:
(A) The property is not occupied by the owner or any lessee or
-27-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
licensee of the owner;
(B) Utility service to the property, including, but not limited to,
gas, electric, or water service, has been disconnected or delinquent for
over one year;
(C) A building on the property has been deemed unfit for human
habitation, occupancy, or use by local housing officials;
(D) A building on the property is open and unprotected and in
reasonable danger of significant damage resulting from exposure to the
elements or vandalism;
(E) A building on the property is unsecure due to multiple windows
and doors being boarded up or closed off, smashed through, broken off or
unhinged, or continuously unlocked;
(F) The property has been stripped of copper or other materials or
interior fixtures to the property have been removed;
(G) There have not been any recent efforts made to restore the
property to productive use;
(H) There is a presence of vermin, uncut vegetation, or debris
accumulation on the property;
(I) There have been past actions by the applicable municipality or
county to maintain the grounds or a building on the property;
(J) The property has been out of compliance with orders of local
housing officials; or
(K) Any other condition or circumstance reasonably indicating that
the property is vacant and abandoned.
(b) The holder of the tax sale certificate or tax deed shall
determine whether or not real estate is vacant and abandoned two years
after the date of the sale of such real estate for taxes or special
assessments.
(c) If the real estate is registered as vacant and abandoned
pursuant to a vacant property registration ordinance adopted by a
municipality, it shall be conclusive proof that such real estate is
-28-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
vacant and abandoned. If the real estate is not registered as vacant and
abandoned pursuant to such an ordinance, the holder of the tax sale
certificate or tax deed shall not be obligated to proceed under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, but may instead choose to proceed
under subdivision (2)(b) of this section, and no deed subsequently issued
to such holder shall be deemed invalid due to noncompliance with
subdivision (2)(a) of this section. No action taken by a holder of a tax
sale certificate or tax deed under subdivision (2)(a) of this section
shall prohibit a subsequent action under subdivision (2)(b) of this
section on the same real estate should it be determined that such real
estate is not vacant and abandoned.
(d) If the holder of the tax sale certificate or tax deed determines
real estate to be vacant and abandoned pursuant to this subsection, the
holder shall submit an affidavit to the county treasurer affirming that
the real estate is vacant and abandoned.
Sec. 37. Section 77-1909, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1909 In its decree, the court shall ascertain and determine the
amount of taxes, special assessments, and other liens, interest, and
costs chargeable to each particular item of real property, excluding any
lien on real estate for special assessments levied by any sanitary and
improvement district which special assessments have not been previously
offered for sale by the county treasurer, and award to the plaintiff an
attorney's fee, unless waived by the plaintiff, in an amount equal to ten
percent of the amount due plus, for good cause shown, reasonable
attorney's fees in excess of the ten percent, which shall be taxed as
part of the costs in the action and apportioned equitably as other costs.
Sec. 38. Original sections 18-3417, 77-1804, 77-1806, 77-1815,
77-1816, 77-1819, 77-1823, 77-1825, 77-1829, 77-1836, 77-1856, 77-1902,
and 77-1909, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 77-1802,
77-1807, 77-1818, 77-1831, 77-1832, 77-1833, 77-1837, and 77-1838,
-29-

LB458 LB458
2025 2025
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 39. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-30-